en: Food Grinders & Mills
xx: Food Grinders & Mills
cs: Mlýnky
da: Madkværne og -møller
de: Lebensmittelmühlen
es: Molinos y trituradoras de comida
fr: Moulins et hachoirs, Hachoir
it: Tritatutto e passaverdure
ja: フードミル
nl: Roerzeven en hakmolens
no: Matkverner
pl: Rozdrabniacze i młynki do żywności
pt: Moedores e amassadores de alimentos
ru: Измельчители пищевых продуктов
sv: Matkvarnar
tr: Gıda Öğütücüleri ve Değirmenleri

en: Food Mixers & Blenders
xx: Food Mixers & Blenders
cs: Mixéry a šlehače
da: Køkkenmaskiner og blendere
de: Mixer & Pürierstäbe
es: Batidoras y licuadoras
fr: Robots mixeurs et blenders, Robots de cuisine, Robot de cuisine, Batteur, Blender, Mixeur
it: Mixer e frullatori
ja: フードミキサー・フードプロセッサー
nl: Mixers en blenders
no: Kjøkkenmiksere og blendere
pl: Miksery i blendery
pt: Mixers e liquidificadores de comida
ru: Миксеры и блендеры
sv: Matmixrar och blenders
tr: Mikserler ve Blender'lar

en: Food Smokers
xx: Food Smokers
cs: Udírny
da: Røgeovne
de: Lebensmittel-Räucheröfen
es: Ahumadores de comida
fr: Fumoirs alimentaires
it: Affumicatoi
ja: 燻製器
nl: Voedselrookovens
no: Røykeapparater
pl: Wędzarnie
pt: Defumadores
ru: Коптильни
sv: Matrökare
tr: Dumanla Pişirme Makineleri

en: Food Warmers
xx: Food Warmers
cs: Ohřívače jídla
da: Varmeplader til mad
de: Speisewärmer
es: Calentadores de comida
fr: Chauffe-repas
it: Scaldavivande
ja: 食品保温器
nl: Warmhoudplaten voor voedsel
no: Matvarmere
pl: Podgrzewacze do żywności
pt: Aquecedores de alimento
ru: Мармиты
sv: Matuppvärmare
tr: Yiyecek Isıtıcıları

en: Chafing Dishes
xx: Chafing Dishes
cs: Ohřívače
da: Fyrfade
de: Buffetwärmer
es: Escalfadores
fr: Appareils de maintien au chaud
it: Piatti scaldavivande
ja: 卓上鍋
nl: Warmhoudplaten
no: Varmefat
pl: Podgrzewacze gastronomiczne
pt: Rechauds
ru: Кастрюли с подогревом
sv: Glödpannor
tr: Sıcak Yemek Servis Tencereleri

en: Food Heat Lamps
xx: Food Heat Lamps
cs: Lampy na ohřev potravin
da: Lamper til opvarmning af mad
de: Speisewärmelampen
es: Lámparas para calentar comida
fr: Lampes chauffantes pour l'alimentation
it: Lampade riscaldanti per alimenti
ja: ヒートランプウォーマー
nl: Warmhoudlampen voor voedsel
no: Matvarmelamper
pl: Lampy do podgrzewania żywności
pt: Lâmpadas para aquecer alimentos
ru: Лампы для подогревания пищи
sv: Värmelampor för mat
tr: Yemek Isıtma Lambaları

en: Rice Keepers
xx: Rice Keepers
cs: Nádoby na vařenou rýži
da: Risbeholdere
de: Reiswärmer
es: Recipientes para arroz
fr: Contenants pour riz cuit
it: Contenitori per riso
ja: おひつ
nl: Bewaarbakken voor rijst
no: Risbeholdere
pl: Pojemniki na ryż
pt: Escorredores de arroz
ru: Кадки для риса
sv: Risvärmare
tr: Pirinç Kapları

en: Steam Tables
xx: Steam Tables
cs: Ohřívací stoly
da: Dampvarmere til fødevarer
de: Warmhaltetische
es: Vitrinas calientes
fr: Tables à vapeur
it: Banchi a vapore
ja: 蒸気保温器
nl: Stoomtafels
no: Dampbord
pl: Bemary gastronomiczne
pt: Balcões térmicos
ru: Столы с паровым подогревом
sv: Hot food-bord
tr: Benmari Servis Masaları

en: Freezers
xx: Freezers
cs: Mrazničky
da: Frysere
de: Gefrierschränke & -truhen
es: Congeladores
fr: Congélateurs, Congélateur, Freezer
it: Congelatori
ja: フリーザー
nl: Vriezers
no: Frysere
pl: Zamrażarki
pt: Congeladores
ru: Морозильные камеры
sv: Frysar
tr: Dondurucular

en: Frozen Drink Makers
xx: Frozen Drink Makers
cs: Výrobníky ledové tříště
da: Slushicemaskiner
de: Slush-Eis-Maschinen
es: Máquinas de granizados
fr: Machines à granité
it: Macchine per granite
ja: フローズンドリンクメーカー
nl: Machines voor schaafijs
no: Slushmaskiner
pl: Maszyny do produkcji lodów
pt: Máquinas de fazer raspadinha
ru: Аппараты для приготовления замороженных десертов
sv: Slushmaskiner
tr: Karlamaç Makineleri

en: Garbage Disposals
xx: Garbage Disposals
cs: Drtiče odpadu
da: Affaldskværne
de: Abfallzerkleinerer
es: Trituradores de desechos
fr: Broyeurs de déchets
it: Tritarifiuti
ja: ディスポーザー
nl: Afvalvernietigers
no: Søppelkverner
pl: Usuwanie odpadów
pt: Trituradores de lixo
ru: Измельчители мусора
sv: Avfallskvarnar
tr: Çöp Öğütücüleri

en: Gas Griddles
xx: Gas Griddles
cs: Plynové plotny
da: Gasbageplader
de: Gasgrillplatten
es: Planchas de gas
fr: Planchas au gaz
it: Piastre a gas
ja: ガスグリドル
nl: Grillplaten voor gas
no: Gass-stekeplater
pl: Płyty gazowe
pt: Grelhas a gás
ru: Газовые противни
sv: Gasdrivna bordsgrillar
tr: Gazlı Saçlar

en: Hot Drink Makers
xx: Hot Drink Makers
cs: Přístroje na přípravu teplých nápojů
da: Apparat til varme drikke
de: Heißgetränkebereiter
es: Preparadores de bebidas calientes
fr: Machines à boissons chaudes
it: Macchine per bevande calde
ja: ホットドリンクメーカー
nl: Apparaten voor het maken van warme dranken
no: Varmdrikk-apparater
pl: Urządzenia do napojów gorących
pt: Máquinas de bebidas quentes
ru: Оборудование для приготовления горячих напитков
sv: Maskiner för varma drycker
tr: Sıcak İçecek Makineleri

en: Hot Plates
xx: Hot Plates
cs: Plotny
da: Varmeplader
de: Kochplatten
es: Placas para calentar
fr: Plaques chauffantes
it: Piastre elettriche
ja: ホットプレート
nl: Warmhoudplaatjes
no: Kokeplater
pl: Kuchenki jednopalnikowe
pt: Chapas quentes para mesa
ru: Электроплитки
sv: Bordsspisar
tr: Elektrikli Ocaklar

en: Ice Cream Makers
xx: Ice Cream Makers
cs: Zmrzlinovače
da: Ismaskiner
de: Speiseeismaschinen
es: Heladeras
fr: Sorbetières et turbines à glace
it: Macchine per il gelato
ja: アイスクリームメーカー
nl: IJsmakers
no: Iskremmaskiner
pl: Maszynki do lodów
pt: Sorveteiras
ru: Мороженицы
sv: Glassmaskiner
tr: Dondurma Makineleri

en: Ice Crushers & Shavers
xx: Ice Crushers & Shavers
cs: Drtiče ledu
da: Isknusere
de: Eis-Crusher & Eis-Shaver
es: Granizadoras y picadoras de hielo
fr: Broyeurs et pileurs de glace
it: Tritaghiaccio
ja: かき氷器
nl: IJscrushers en -schavers
no: Isknusere
pl: Kruszarki do lodu
pt: Máquinas de gelo
ru: Молотки и шейверы для льда
sv: Iskrossar och -hyvlar
tr: Buz Kırıcılar ve Tıraşlayıcılar

en: Ice Makers
xx: Ice Makers
cs: Ledovače
da: Isterningmaskiner
de: Eismaschinen
es: Máquinas de hielo
fr: Machines à glaçons
it: Macchine produzione ghiaccio
ja: 製氷機
nl: Machines voor ijs
no: Ismaskiner
pl: Maszynki do lodu
pt: Máquinas de fazer gelo
ru: Льдогенераторы
sv: Ismaskiner
tr: Buz Yapıcılar

en: Juicers
xx: Juicers
cs: Odšťavňovače
da: Saftpressere
de: Entsafter
es: Exprimidores
fr: Extracteurs de jus
it: Spremitori
ja: ジューサー
nl: Fruitpersen
no: Juicemaskiner
pl: Wyciskarki soków
pt: Espremedores
ru: Соковыжималки
sv: Juicepressar
tr: Meyve Sıkacakları

en: Knife Sharpeners
xx: Knife Sharpeners
cs: Ostřiče nožů
da: Knivskærpere
de: Messerschärfer
es: Afiladores de cuchillos
fr: Aiguiseurs de couteaux
it: Affilatrici coltelli
ja: 包丁研ぎ器
nl: Messenslijpers
no: Knivslipere
pl: Ostrzałki do noży
pt: Afiadores de faca
ru: Ножеточки
sv: Knivslipare
tr: Bıçak Bileyiciler

en: Microwave Ovens, Micro-waves
xx: Microwave Ovens
cs: Mikrovlnné trouby
da: Mikrobølgeovne
de: Mikrowellenherde, Mikrowellen
es: Hornos microondas, Microondas
fr: Fours à micro-ondes, Micro-ondes, Four micro-ondes
it: Forni a microonde
ja: 電子レンジ
nl: Magnetrons
no: Mikrobølgeovner
pl: Mikrofalówki
pt: Micro-ondas
ru: Микроволновые печи
sv: Mikrovågsugnar
tr: Mikrodalga Fırınlar